Tennessee, session 114, HB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-107, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) The commission shall also issue a certificate of compliance to a person
appointed as a special deputy; provided, that the person meets the qualifications for
employment as a police officer and satisfactorily completes an approved recruit training
program as required by this part. To retain this certification, the special deputy shall also
successfully complete an annual in-service training session appropriate for the special
deputy's responsibilities.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1095
002796
- 1 -